Utah statutes.
67-19a-203.   Rulemaking authority.
The board may make rules governing:
(1)  definitions of terms, phrases, and words used in the grievance process
established by this chapter;
(2)  what matters constitute excusable neglect for purposes of the waiver of
time limits established by this chapter;
(3)  the application for and service of subpoenas, the service and filing of
pleadings, and the issuance of rulings, orders, determinations, summary
judgments, transcripts, and other legal documents necessary in grievance
proceedings;
(4)  the use, calling, attendance, participation, and fees of witnesses in
grievance proceedings;
(5)  continuances of grievance proceedings;
(6)  procedures in jurisdictional and evidentiary hearings, unless governed by
Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act;
(7)  the presence of media representatives at grievance proceedings; and
(8)  procedures for sealing files or making data pertaining to a grievance
unavailable to the public.
